Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 41
STATE BOARD OF STOCK INSPECTION COMMISSIONERS

Section

35-41-100.3. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means the state board of stock inspection commissioners, created by this article.

(1.4) "Bovine livestock" means:

All cattle and calves; and

All sheep being treated as livestock at the request of the owner thereof.

(1.5) "Division" means the division of brand inspection in the department of agriculture, created in section 24-1-123 (4)(g)(I), C.R.S.

(1.7) "Equine livestock" means all horses, mules, and burros.

"Feedlot" means a lot, pen enclosure, or building where cattle are fed for warm-up or fattening purposes and which is secured by gates to prevent the livestock from movement to adjoining areas outside of feedlot.

"Hide" means the skin from livestock.

"Licensed slaughterhouse", "butcher", or "packing establishment" means a person, association, firm, or corporation carrying on the trade or business of slaughtering cattle, horses, mules, or burros for compensation or profit, under a license issued by the state.

"Livestock" means all cattle, calves, horses, mules, and burros, or sheep may be treated as livestock for purposes of this article at the request of the owner thereof.

"Public livestock market" means any place, establishment, or facility commonly known as a livestock market, conducted or operated for compensation or profit licensed in the state of Colorado, where brand inspection is normally maintained.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1707, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1.4) and (1.7) added, p. 262, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2004:

(1.5) added, p. 642, § 1, effective July 1.

35-41-101. State board of stock inspection commissioners - creation - brand commissioner - enterprise - bonds.

There is created the state board of stock inspection commissioners, composed of five commissioners who shall be appointed by the governor, all of whom shall be actively engaged in the production or feeding of cattle, horses, or sheep, with the consent of the senate. Two of the members shall represent the nonconfinement cattle industry; two of the members shall represent the confinement cattle industry; and one shall have broad general knowledge of the Colorado livestock industry and shall represent the commodity, other than the confinement and nonconfinement cattle industries, with the largest percentage of charged fees. The members of the board shall be appointed in such manner as will at all times represent as nearly as possible all sections of the state wherein livestock is a major activity, but at no time shall any two members be residents of the same particular section of the state. The term of office of the commissioners is four years. Members may be removed for cause by the governor. They serve without compensation but are entitled to reimbursement for actual and necessary traveling expenses. The board shall meet monthly unless, in case of emergency, a special meeting is deemed advisable.

The board shall appoint a brand commissioner who shall be under its supervision and who, in the absence of the board, shall carry out its policies. The brand commissioner shall be subject to the state personnel system laws. His compensation shall be paid out of the brand inspection fund. The brand commissioner, certified by the state personnel director to his position on April 27, 1963, shall continue in such certified status as provided by law.

The board shall make such rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, concerning the manner of inspection of brands and livestock as it deems proper.

The state board of stock inspection commissioners and the office of brand commissioner created in this section are part of the division of brand inspection in the department of agriculture. The state board of stock inspection commissioners and the office of brand commissioner are type 1 entities, as defined in section 24-1-105.

The division and the board shall constitute an enterprise for the purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution, so long as the board retains the authority to issue revenue bonds and the board and the division receive less than ten percent of their total annual revenues in grants, as defined in section 24-77-102 (7), C.R.S., from all Colorado state and local governments combined. So long as it constitutes an enterprise pursuant to this section, the division and the board shall not be subject to any of the limitations imposed by section 20 of article X of the state constitution.

The enterprise created pursuant to this section shall have all the powers and duties authorized by this title with regard to the board and the division.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or restrict the authority of the division to expend its revenues consistent with the provisions of this article and articles 41.5, 43, 44, 46, 47, 53, 53.5, 55, 57, and 57.8 of this title.

The board may, by resolution that meets the requirements of subsection (7) of this section, authorize and issue revenue bonds in an amount not to exceed ten million dollars in the aggregate for expenses of the division. The bonds may be issued only after approval by both chambers of the general assembly, acting either by bill or by joint resolution, and after approval by the governor in accordance with section 39 of article V of the state constitution. The bonds shall be payable only from moneys allocated to the division for expenses of the division pursuant to section 35-41-102.

All bonds issued by the board shall specify that:

No holder of any bonds may compel the state or any subdivision thereof to exercise its appropriation or taxing power; and

The bonds do not constitute a debt or financial obligation of the state and are payable only from the net revenues allocated to the division for expenses as designated in the bonds.

The interest rate or rates on, and the denomination or denominations of, the bonds; and

The medium of payment of the bonds and the place where the bonds will be paid.

A resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds under the terms of this section shall state:

(I) The date of issuance of the bonds;

(II) A maturity date or dates during a period not to exceed thirty years after the date of issuance of the bonds;

A resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds under the terms of this section may:

State that the bonds are to be issued in one or more series;

State a rank or priority of the bonds; and

Provide for redemption of the bonds prior to maturity, with or without premium.

Bonds issued pursuant to the terms of this section may be sold at public or private sale. If bonds are to be sold at a public sale, the board shall advertise the sale in any manner the board deems appropriate. All bonds issued pursuant to the terms of this section shall be sold at a price not less than the par value thereof, together with all accrued interest to the date of delivery.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, all bonds issued pursuant to this section are negotiable.

A resolution pertaining to issuance of bonds under this section may contain covenants as to:

(I) The purpose to which the proceeds of sale of the bonds may be applied and to the use and disposition thereof;

(II) Such matters as are customary in the issuance of revenue bonds, including, without limitation, the issuance and lien position of other or additional bonds; and

(III) Books of account and the inspection and audit thereof.

A resolution made pursuant to this section shall be deemed a contract with the holders of the bonds, and the duties of the board under the resolution shall be enforceable by any appropriate action in a court of competent jurisdiction.

Bonds issued under this section and bearing the signatures of the board members in office on the date of the signing shall be deemed valid and binding obligations regardless of whether, prior to delivery and payment of the bonds, any or all of the persons whose signatures appear thereon have ceased to be members of the board.

Except as otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the bonds, all bonds of the same issue under this section shall have a prior and paramount lien on the net revenues pledged therefor. The board may provide for preferential security for any bonds, both principal and interest, to be issued under this section to the extent deemed feasible and desirable by the board over any bonds that may be issued thereafter.

Bonds of the same issue or series issued under this section shall be equally and ratably secured, without priority by reason of number, date, sale, execution, or delivery, by a lien on the net revenue pledged in accordance with the terms of the resolution authorizing the bonds.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 434, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 6390.

C.L.

§ 3173.

CSA:

C. 160, § 77.

CRS 53:

§ 8-1-1.

L. 63:

p. 182, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-1-1.

L. 69:

p. 121, § 2.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 1610, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 912, § 27, effective June 15.

L. 2004:

(1) amended and (5) to (12) added, p. 642, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 78, § 106, effective February 25; (4) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3403, § 149, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

35-41-102. Brand inspection fund - estray fund.

All moneys coming into the hands of the board from the sale of estray animals shall constitute and be known as the estray fund, which fund is hereby created and continuously appropriated to the board, and shall be kept in an account separate and distinct from other accounts, in conformity with rules to be prescribed by said board. The estray fund is an escrow fund that the board shall keep in trust for the owner of the estray animal for six years after the date the proceeds from the sale of the animal were deposited in the fund. If the owner submits suitable proof of ownership to the board within the six-year period, the board shall pay to the owner the proceeds from the sale. If no such proof has been submitted within the six-year period, the board may expend the proceeds pursuant to this section. All other revenues coming into the hands of the board, including fees collected for the inspection of cattle, shall constitute and be known as the brand inspection fund, which shall be kept in conformity with the rules to be prescribed by the board. The board is authorized, in the administration of the brand inspection fund, to maintain an accounts receivable system for the collection of all moneys to be credited to the fund. The board is authorized to expend, of the revenues in the estray fund and the brand inspection fund:

Repealed.

Effective July 1, 2006, a maximum of three and six-tenths percent, or actual costs, whichever is less.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 443, § 26.

R.S. 08:

§ 6417.

C.L.

§ 3219.

CSA:

C. 160, § 136.

CRS 53:

§ 8-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-1-2.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1611, § 1, effective March 26.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 1224, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1396, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 389, § 1, effective March 5.

L. 2004:

IP(1) amended, p. 645, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1)(a)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (1)(a), effective July 1, 2006. (See L. 2003, p. 389.)

Cross references:

For additional provisions concerning moneys paid into and expenditures of the estray fund, see §§ 35-41-103, 35-41.5-117, 35-42-109, 35-44-106, 35-44-113, 35-50-109, 35-53-109, 35-53-110, 35-53-119, 38-20-206, and 38-20-207; for additional provisions concerning moneys paid into and expenditures of the brand inspection fund, see §§ 35-41-101, 35-41.5-117, 35-43-114, 35-43-115, 35-43-115.5, 35-44-113, 35-53-110, 35-53.5-113, 35-55-115, 40-27-108, and 40-27-109.

35-41-103. Revolving fund.

The state board of stock inspection commissioners may establish a revolving fund from the estray fund or other available funds of the board in the amount of one thousand dollars to refund to the state treasurer or other persons for short checks deposited, duplicate collection of fees, recording fees on cancellation of brands, or other necessary refunds, and the fund shall be reimbursed from the department's funds by voucher. A quarterly report shall be made as required by law to the controller showing all transactions involving the account.

Source:

L. 53:

597, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 8-1-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-1-3.

35-41-104. Board's authority to impose fees and charges - rules.

Bovine livestock.

The board is hereby authorized to levy and collect, through authorized brand inspectors, a per-head inspection fee in an amount determined by the board by rule on all bovine livestock inspected; except that the charges for livestock shipped directly to a licensed slaughter plant are as follows: For the first five hundred head per owner per certificate, two cents below the set inspection fee, and for over five hundred head per owner per certificate, five cents below the set inspection fee. Such sliding scale charges shall take effect at such time as the set inspection fee exceeds thirty-four cents. The inspection fee established pursuant to this paragraph (a) shall apply when any bovine livestock are being consigned to a Colorado-licensed public livestock market.

In addition, the board is authorized to levy and collect, through authorized brand inspectors, a minimum fee in an amount determined by the board by rule from each person, company, or corporation requesting the brand inspection or from whom a brand inspection is required by law; except that, when cattle that are owned by more than one person are inspected at one site, only one such minimum fee shall be collected. The minimum fee shall be due and payable to the inspector when the inspector arrives at the designated inspection point, whether or not an inspection of the livestock actually takes place.

(1.5) Equine livestock.

shall apply when any equine livestock are being consigned to a Colorado-licensed public livestock market.

In addition, the board is authorized to levy and collect, through authorized brand inspectors, a minimum fee in an amount determined by the board by rule from each person, company, or corporation requesting the brand inspection or from whom a brand inspection is required by law. The minimum fee shall be due and payable to the inspector when the inspector arrives at the designated inspection point, whether or not an inspection of the livestock actually takes place.

It is the duty of all authorized Colorado brand inspectors to inspect all livestock, except such as are exempt by law, that are offered for sale or to be moved interstate or intrastate and to collect the fees established pursuant to subsections (1) and (1.5) of this section. The board shall determine the amount of the fees that shall be collected by authorized brand inspectors from the owner or person in charge of said livestock before issuing a certificate of brand inspection granting leave to the owner or person in charge to offer the brand inspected livestock for sale or movement interstate or intrastate. The fees so collected shall be reported and transmitted to the board at such time and in such manner as the board shall by rule require.

Inspection fees as authorized in subsections (1) and (1.5) of this section shall be collected by brand inspectors from the owners or persons in charge of said livestock before issuing any certificate when:

Brand inspection is required by law;

Livestock are being consigned for sale at a Colorado licensed public livestock market in accordance with section 35-55-112;

Livestock are consigned for slaughter to a custom meat processor licensed by the Colorado department of agriculture or a packing plant licensed by the United States department of agriculture;

Livestock are offered for sale in accordance with section 35-53-105;

Livestock are moved within Colorado or to another state, except as exempted by law;

Livestock are being moved from pasture before being placed in a feedlot, in accordance with section 35-53-125.

Minimum fee when inspection required by law - bovine livestock. A minimum fee in an amount determined by the board by rule shall be collected from each person, company, or corporation requesting the brand inspection or from whom a brand inspection is required by law; except that, when bovine livestock owned by more than one person are inspected at one site, only one minimum fee shall be collected. No minimum fee shall be required when bovine livestock are consigned for sale at a Colorado-licensed public livestock market.

(4.5)

Minimum fee when inspection required by law - equine livestock.

A minimum fee in an amount determined by the board by rule shall be collected from each person, company, or corporation requesting the brand inspection or from whom a brand inspection is required by law. No minimum fee shall be required when equine livestock are consigned for sale at a Colorado-licensed public livestock market.

In addition to the brand inspection fee, a Colorado beef board fee up to and not in excess of one dollar per head or the amount assessed pursuant to the beef promotion and research order, 7 CFR 1260.172, as amended, whichever is greater, shall be collected on cattle and calves as a part of the brand inspection made on such animals under the same authority, at the same time and place, in the same manner, and upon the same animals which are subject to brand inspection and a brand inspection fee, except:

When cattle and calves are being moved in excess of seventy-five land miles within the state for grazing purposes if no change in ownership is involved; or

When any unbranded or freshly branded calves are inspected with their mothers as provided in section 35-43-129 and no change in ownership is involved; or

When cattle are placed in a feedlot with no change in ownership, or when rodeo competition cattle are inspected at the headquarters ranch before the beginning of rodeo season and the cattle will not leave the state.

In the case of unbranded or freshly branded calves inspected with their mothers in compliance with section 35-43-129, in addition to the inspection fee for each calf inspected, mileage expense allowed by section 35-43-129 shall also be collected.

An inspection fee in an amount determined by the board by rule shall be collected for each hide inspected as provided in section 35-53-115.

The board shall determine, and publish in its rules, which inspection fees can be carried on an accounts receivable basis. No such account shall be carried for a period that exceeds one month.

The board shall have the authority to impose a mileage charge when brand inspection is required for investigations of estrays, investigations of theft, and other duties deemed necessary by statute or the board. The charge per mile shall be the amount allowed state officers and employees pursuant to section 24-9-104, C.R.S.

In addition to the brand inspection fee authorized by this section, the assessment determined by the board of directors of the Colorado horse development authority pursuant to section 35-57.8-109 shall be collected on horses as a part of the brand inspection made on horses under the same authority, at the same time and place, in the same manner, and on the same horses that are subject to brand inspection and brand inspection fees.

Any rule adopted by the board to determine the amount of a fee authorized by this title shall be subject to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.; except that:

The board shall provide the livestock industry with thirty days' notice of any fee change proposal and of the date and location of an informational meeting at which the changes shall be discussed;

At or after the next regularly scheduled board meeting after such informational meeting, the board may set the fees; and

The fee change shall take effect at least ninety days after the board sets the fees.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1707, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

IP(5) and (5)(c) amended, p. 1141, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(1), (4), and (7) amended and (9) added, p. 1403, § 1, effective May 2.

L. 93:

IP(5) amended, p. 1855, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(10) added, p. 1258, § 1, effective June 1; (1), (2), IP(3), (4), and (6) amended and (1.5) and (4.5) added, p. 262, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2004:

(1), (1.5), (2), (4), (4.5), (7), and (8) amended and (11) added, p. 646, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(3)(c) amended, (SB 09-151), ch. 89, p. 347, § 6, effective July 1.